District of Columbia statutes.
42-818.01

Tracking addresses.

Every deed of trust or substitution of trustee offered for recordation shall have the name and address of each party to the deed of trust or substitution of trustee typed or printed directly above or below the signature of the party. Deeds of trust or substitution of trustee submitted without both the name and address of each person will not be recorded.

March 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1271, ch. 854, § 545a
as added Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 701, 45 DCR 1172
1981 Ed., § 45-718.1.